Washington statutes.
RCW 36.34.230

Lease or conveyance to United States for flood control, navigation, and allied purposes—State consents to conveyance.

Pursuant to the Constitution and laws of the United States and the Constitution of this state, consent of the legislature is given to such conveyance by a county to the United States for such purposes.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.34.230. Prior: 1937 c 46 s 2; RRS s 4015-7.]